Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 8
EXEMPT PLANS

31-30.5-801. Exempt alternative programs authorized.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article or the provisions of article 31 of this title that specifically refer to exempt plans, any municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district, prior to January 1, 1980, may establish an alternative police officers' or firefighters' pension benefit program or combination pension and insurance benefit program for police officers or firefighters that, if found by an actuarial study to be actuarially sound, shall be exempt from all provisions of parts 3 to 7 of this article. Such program and any amendments thereto must be approved in an election held or vote called for that purpose by at least sixty-five percent of the total votes cast by all police officers or firefighters actively employed by the municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district and all former old hire members who have earned pension rights or benefits under this article at the time the program is adopted or amended. No amendment of an exempt alternative program may be adopted that would adversely affect the accrued pension benefits of former old hire members. Once established, such exempt alternative program shall cover all police officers or firefighters employed by the municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district, regardless of the date of hire. Any municipality, fire protection district, or county improvement district having established an exempt alternative program pursuant to this section shall be entitled to receive its appropriate share of state contributions to local police officers' or firefighters' pension funds and shall file any reports required to receive such state contributions. The date limitation of January 1, 1980, established in this subsection (1) shall not be construed as limiting the ability of an employer to establish an exempt money purchase plan in accordance with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section and section 31-30.5-802.

Not later than January 1, 1983, any employer that covered its firefighters or police officers hired on or after April 8, 1978, under the statewide defined benefit plan established in part 4 of article 31 of this title, may withdraw from that plan upon establishment of a money purchase plan, in accordance with the requirements governing exempt alternative programs under subsection (1) of this section.

Such money purchase plan shall include all firefighters or police officers hired on or after April 8, 1978, and may include all old hire firefighter or police officer members, at the option of the employer.

The money purchase plan shall be approved by sixty-five percent of all firefighters or police officers hired on or after April 8, 1978. In order for old hire firefighter or police officer members to be included in such plan, pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), sixty-five percent of those members shall approve the plan.

Any employer desiring to withdraw pursuant to the provisions of this section shall file a resolution with the fire and police pension association stating such intent. The resolution shall also state a requested effective date for withdrawal.

The withdrawal shall be effective on the requested effective date or on the first day of the month following certification by the fire and police pension association of the approval of the members, whichever occurs later.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 889, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 776, § 64, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-325.

31-30.5-802. Exempt money purchase plan option.

Any employer that has not elected to affiliate with the fire and police pension association relating to an old hire plan established pursuant to this article may offer to the active old hire members of such plan the option of converting to a money purchase plan.

Such option shall be available on an individual basis such that any member desiring to remain in the current defined benefit plan may do so.

The money purchase plan offered may be a new plan established by the employer or an existing plan maintained for the benefit of other members employed in the same department.

Any such money purchase plan shall be exempt from all provisions of parts 3 to 7 of this article.

The option may be offered only if approved by at least sixty-five percent of all active old hire members. If approved, a deadline shall be set for electing between the current plan and the money purchase plan. Prior to said deadline, the employer shall provide to each active old hire member a disclosure statement describing the differences between the current plan and the money purchase plan and a statement as to the minimum beginning account balance for such employee in the event of conversion to a money purchase plan.

If any active old hire member elects to remain in the current plan, the employer shall continue to fund such plan on an actuarially sound basis with any unfunded liability being amortized over a period not to exceed twenty years after January 1, 1989.

Within ninety days after the election is made by each active old hire member, the employer shall make the final determination as to whether to adopt such option and shall be under no obligation to do so. In the event that the employer determines that the option will not be adopted at that time, the employer may reoffer the option at a later date in accordance with the provisions contained in this section.

No such option may be adopted which, in its application, would adversely affect the pension benefits of retired old hire members.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an election by an employer to affiliate its local plan with the fire and police pension association after said employer has adopted a money purchase plan option pursuant to this section. Any such affiliation shall be governed by the provisions of section 31-31-701.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 890, § 1, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1003.3.

31-30.5-803. Investment authority.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, moneys of exempt alternative plans that are not affiliated with the fire and police pension association under section 31-31-706 may be managed and invested by the trustees of such plans pursuant to the standard and other provisions for trustees set forth in the "Colorado Uniform Prudent Investor Act", article 1.1 of title 15, C.R.S. Such investments shall be audited at least biennially.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 10, § 2, effective March 13, 1997.)

The trustees of an exempt alternative plan may allow a participant to exercise control of the investment of the participant's accrued benefit under the plan, subject to the following requirements:

The trustees shall select at least three investment alternatives, each of which is diversified in itself, that allow the participant a broad range of investments and a meaningful choice between risk and return in the investment of the participant's accrued benefit;

The trustees shall allow the participant to change investments at least once each calendar quarter; and

The trustees shall provide the participant with information describing the investment alternatives and the nature, investment performance, fees, and expenses of the investment alternatives and other information to enable a participant to make informed investment decisions.

Neither the state nor local governments shall be held responsible to pay for any or all financial losses experienced by participants of the exempt alternative plan; except that nothing in this section relieves a local government's responsibility as a trustee to the plan.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 892, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 10, § 2, effective March 13.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1204, § 74, effective August 4.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (SB 10-024), ch. 20, p. 90, § 3, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This section was formerly numbered as § 31-30-1012 (8).